zh-TW: 大麻二酚 (CBD) 成分: 人工色素; 人工香料; 廣譜大麻二酚 (CBD); 大麻二酚 (CBD) 分離物; 辣椒素; 柑橘油; 黃酮類化合物; 全光譜大麻二酚 (CBD); 明膠; 薑; 大麻籽油; 薰衣草油; 檸檬油; MCT 油; 褪黑激素; 天然色素; 天然香料; Omega-3 脂肪酸; Omega-6 脂肪酸; 果膠; 薄荷油; 防腐劑; 甜味劑; 萜烯; 薑黃; 維生素 E; 其他
it: Ingredienti del CBD: Coloranti artificiali; Aromi artificiali; CBD ad ampio spettro; Isolato di CBD; Capsaicina; Oli di agrumi; Flavonoidi; CBD a spettro completo; Gelatina; Zenzero; Olio di semi di canapa; Olio di lavanda; Olio di limone; Olio MCT; Melatonina; Coloranti naturali; Aromi naturali; Acidi grassi omega-3; Acidi grassi omega-6; Pectina; Olio di menta piperita; Conservanti; Dolcificanti; Terpeni; Curcuma; Vitamina E; Altro
ro-RO: Ingrediente CBD: Coloranți artificiali; Arome artificiale; CBD cu spectru larg; Izolat de CBD; Capsaicină; Uleiuri de citrice; Flavonoide; CBD cu spectru vast; Gelatină; Ghimbir; Ulei din semințe de cânepă; Ulei de lavandă; Ulei de lămâie; Ulei MCT; Melatonină; Coloranți naturali; Arome naturale; Acizi grași Omega-3; Acizi grași Omega-6; Pectină; Ulei de mentă; Conservanți; Îndulcitori; Terpene; Turmeric; Vitamina E; Altele
lt-LT: CBD ingredientai: Dirbtiniai dažikliai; Dirbtinės kvapiosios medžiagos; Plataus spektro CBD; CBD izoliatas; Kapsaicinas; Citrusiniai aliejai; Flavanoidai; Viso spektro CBD; Želatina; Imbieras; Kanapių sėklų aliejus; Levandų aliejus; Citrinų aliejus; MCT aliejus; Melatoninas; Natūralūs dažikliai; Natūralios kvapiosios medžiagos; Omega-3 riebalų rūgštys; Omega-6 riebalų rūgštys; Pektinas; Pipirmėčių aliejus; Konservantai; Saldikliai; Terpenai; Ciberžolė; Vitaminas E; Kita
en: CBD ingredients: Artificial colorings; Artificial flavorings; Broad-spectrum CBD; CBD isolate; Capsaicin; Citrus oils; Flavonoids; Full-spectrum CBD; Gelatin; Ginger; Hemp seed oil; Lavender oil; Lemon oil; MCT oil; Melatonin; Natural colorings; Natural flavorings; Omega-3 fatty acids; Omega-6 fatty acids; Pectin; Peppermint oil; Preservatives; Sweeteners; Terpenes; Turmeric; Vitamin E; Other
vi: Thành phần CBD: Chất tạo màu nhân tạo; Hương liệu nhân tạo; CBD phổ rộng; Cô lập CBD; Capsaicin; Dầu cam quýt; Flavonoids; CBD toàn phổ; Gelatin; Gừng; Dầu hạt cây gai dầu; Dầu hoa oải hương; Dầu chanh; Dầu MCT; Melatonin; Chất tạo màu tự nhiên; Hương liệu tự nhiên; Axit béo omega-3; Axit béo omega-6; Xơ tan trong nước; Dầu bạc hà cay; Chất bảo quản; Chất tạo ngọt; Terpen; Nghệ; Vitamin E; Khác
da: CBD-ingredienser: Kunstige farvestoffer; Kunstige smagsstoffer; Bredspektret CBD; CBD-isolat; Capsaicin; Citrusolier; Flavonoider; Fuldspektret CBD; Gelatine; Ingefær; Hampefrøolie; Lavendelolie; Citronolie; MCT-olie; Melatonin; Naturlige farvestoffer; Naturlige smagsstoffer; Omega-3-fedtsyrer; Omega-6-fedtsyrer; Pektin; Pebermynteolie; Konserveringsmidler; Sødemidler; Terpener; Gurkemeje; E-vitamin; Andet
fi: CBD-ainesosat: Keinotekoiset väriaineet; Keinotekoiset aromit; Laajan spektrin CBD; CBD-isolaatti; Kapsaisiini; Sitruunaöljyt; Flavonoidit; Täyden spektrin CBD; Gelatiini; Inkivääri; Hampunsiemenöljy; Laventeliöljy; Sitruunaöljy; MCT öljy; Melatoniini; Luonnolliset väriaineet; Luonnolliset aromit; Omega-3-rasvahapot; Omega-6-rasvahapot; Pektiini; Piparminttuöljy; Säilöntäaineet; Makeutusaineet; Terpeenit; Kurkuma; E-vitamiini; Muu
hu: CBD-összetevők: Mesterséges színezékek; Mesterséges ízesítők; Széles spektrumú CBD; CBD-izolátum; Kapszaicin; Citrusolajok; Flavonoidok; Széles spektrumú CBD; Zselatin; Gyömbér; Kendermagolaj; Levendulaolaj; Citromolaj; MCT olaj; Melatonin; Természetes színezékek; Természetes ízesítők; Omega-3 zsírsavak; Omega-6 zsírsavak; Pektin; Borsmentaolaj; Tartósítószerek; Édesítőszerek; Terpének; Kurkuma; E-vitamin; Egyéb
de: CBD-Inhaltsstoffe: Künstliche Farbstoffe; Künstliche Aromastoffe; Breitband-CBD; CBD-Isolat; Capsaicin; Zitrusöle; Flavonoide; Vollspektrum-CBD; Gelatine; Ingwer; Hanföl; Lavendelöl; Zitronenöl; MCT-Öl; Melatonin; Natürliche Farbstoffe; Natürliche Aromastoffe; Omega-3-Fettsäuren; Omega-6-Fettsäuren; Pektin; Pfefferminzöl; Konservierungsmittel; Süßstoffe; Terpene; Kurkuma; Vitamin E; Sonstiges
sv: Ingredienser CBD: Färgämnen; Konstgjorda smakämnen; Bredspektrum CBD; CBD-isolat; Capsaicin; Citrus-oljor; Flavonoider; Fullspektrum CBD; Gelatin; Ingefära; Hampafröolja; Lavendelolja; Citronolja; MCT-olja; Melatonin; Naturliga färger; Naturliga smakämnen; Omega-3-fettsyror; Omega-6-fettsyror; Pektin; Pepparmintsolja; Konserveringsmedel; Sötningsmedel; Terpener; Gurkmeja; Vitamin E; Övrigt
nb: CBD-ingredienser: Kunstige fargestoffer; Kunstige smaker; Bredspektret CBD; CBD-isolat; Capsaicin; Sitrusoljer; Flavonoider; Fullt CBD-spektrum; Gelatin; Ingefær; Hampfrøolje; Lavendelolje; Sitronolje; MCT-olje; Melatonin; Naturlige fargestoffer; Naturlige smaker; Fettsyrer med Omega-3; Fettsyrer med Omega-6; Pektin; Peppermynte; Konserveringsmidler; Søtstoffer; Terpener; Gurkemeie; Vitamin E; Annet
bg-BG: Съставки на CBD: Изкуствени оцветители; Изкуствени ароматизатори; CBD с широк спектър; CBD изолат; Капсаицин; Цитрусови масла; Флавоноиди; CBD с пълен спектър; Желатин; Джинджифил; Масло от конопено семе; Масло от лавандула; Лимоново масло; Масло MCT; Мелатонин; Естествени оцветители; Естествени ароматизатори; Омега-3 мастни киселини; Омега-6 мастни киселини; Пектин; Масло от мента; Консерванти; Подсладители; Терпени; Куркума; Витамин Е; Други
ja: CBDの成分: 人工着色料; 人工香料; ブロードスペクトラムCBD; CBDアイソレート; カプサイシン; 柑橘系オイル; フラボノイド; フルスペクトラムCBD; ゼラチン; ショウガ; ヘンプシードオイル; ラベンダーオイル; レモンオイル; MCTオイル; メラトニン; 天然着色料; 天然香料; オメガ3脂肪酸; オメガ6脂肪酸; ペクチン; ペパーミントオイル; 防腐剤; 甘味料; テルペン; ターメリック; ビタミンE; その他
ko: CBD 성분: 인공 색소; 인공 향료; 광범위 CBD; CBD 격리; 캡사이신; 감귤 오일; 플라보노이드; 풀 스펙트럼 CBD; 젤라틴; 생강; 삼씨오일; 라벤더 오일; 레몬 오일; MCT 오일; 멜라토닌; 천연 색소; 천연 향료; 오메가-3 지방산; 오메가-6 지방산; 펙틴; 페퍼민트 오일; 방부제; 감미료; 테르펜; 터메릭; 비타민 E; 기타
th: ส่วนผสมของ CBD: สีสังเคราะห์; สารให้กลิ่นรสสังเคราะห์; CBD สเปกตรัมกว้าง; CBD บริสุทธิ์; แคปไซซิน; น้ำมันผิวส้ม; ฟลาโวนอยด์; CBD แบบเต็มสเปกตรัม; เจลาติน; ขิง; น้ำมันเมล็ดกัญชง; น้ำมันลาเวนเดอร์; น้ำมันเลมอน; น้ำมัน MCT; เมลาโทนิน; สีธรรมชาติ; สารให้กลิ่นรสจากธรรมชาติ; กรดไขมันโอเมกา-3; กรดไขมันโอเมกา-6; เพกติน; น้ำมันเปปเปอร์มินต์; สารกันบูด; สารให้ความหวาน; เทอร์พีเนส; ขมิ้นชัน; วิตามินอี; อื่นๆ
el: Συστατικά CBD: Τεχνητές χρωστικές; Τεχνητές αρωματικές ύλες; CBD ευρέος φάσματος; Απομονωμένο CBD; Καψαϊκίνη; Έλαια εσπεριδοειδών; Φλαβονοειδή; CBD πλήρους φάσματος; Ζελατίνη; Τζίντζερ; Έλαιο σπόρων κάνναβης; Έλαιο λεβάντας; Έλαιο λεμονιού; Έλαιο MCT; Μελατονίνη; Φυσικές χρωστικές; Φυσικές αρωματικές ύλες; Ωμέγα-3 λιπαρά οξέα; Ωμέγα-6 λιπαρά οξέα; Πηκτίνη; Μινθέλαιο; Συντηρητικά; Γλυκαντικά; Τερπένια; Κουρκουμάς; Βιταμίνη Ε; Άλλο
cs: Ingredience CBD: Umělá barviva; Umělé příchutě; Širokospektrální CBD; CBD izolát; Kapsaicin; Citrusové oleje; Flavonoidy; Celospektrální CBD; Želatina; Zázvor; Olej z konopných semínek; Levandulový olej; Citronový olej; MCT olej; Melatonin; Přírodní barviva; Přírodní příchutě; Omega 3 mastné kyseliny; Omega 6 mastné kyseliny; Pektin; Mátový olej; Konzervanty; Sladidla; Terpeny; Kurkuma; Vitamín E; Jiné
sl-SI: Sestavine CBD: Umetna barvila; Umetne arome; CBD širokega spektra; CBD izolat; Kapsaicin; Citrusna olja; Flavonoidi; CBD celotnega spektra; Želatina; Ingver; Konopljino olje; Olje sivke; Limonino olje; MCT olje; Melatonin; Naravna barvila; Naravne arome; Omega-3 maščobne kisline; Omega-6 maščobne kisline; Pektin; Olje poprove mete; Konzervansi; Sladila; Terpeni; Kurkuma; Vitamin E; Drugo
zh-CN: 大麻二酚含量: 人工色素; 人工香料; 广谱大麻二酚; CBD 分离物; 辣椒素; 柑橘油; 类黄酮; 全谱大麻二酚; 明胶; 姜; 大麻籽油; 薰衣草油; 柠檬油; 中链甘油三酯油; 褪黑素; 天然色素; 天然调味料; 欧米伽 3 脂肪酸; 欧米伽 6 脂肪酸; 果胶; 薄荷油; 防腐剂; 甜味剂; 萜烯; 姜黄; 维生素 E; 其他
sk-SK: CBD zložky: Umelé farbivá; Umelé dochucovadlá; Širokospektrálne CBD; Izolát CBD; Kapsaicín; Citrusové oleje; Flavonoidy; Celospektrálne CBD; Želatína; Zázvor; Olej z konopných semien; Levanduľový olej; Citrónový olej; Olej MCT; Melatonín; Prírodné farbivá; Prírodné arómy; Omega-3 mastné kyseliny; Omega-6 mastné kyseliny; Pektín; Mätový olej; Konzervačné látky; Sladidlá; Terpény; Kurkuma; Vitamín E; Iné
ru: Содержащие КБД ингредиенты: Искусственные красители; Искусственные ароматизаторы; КБД широкого спектра; Изолят КБД; Капсаицин; Цитрусовые масла; Флавоноиды; КБД полного спектра; Желатин; Имбирь; Конопляное масло; Масло лаванды; Лимонное масло; Масло МСТ; Мелатонин; Натуральные красители; Натуральные ароматизаторы; Омега-3 жирные кислоты; Омега-6 жирные кислоты; Пектин; Масло перечной мяты; Консерванты; Подсластители; Терпены; Куркума; Витамин Е; Другое
fr: Ingrédients du CBD: Colorants artificiels; Arômes artificiels; CBD à spectre large; Isolat de CBD; Capsaïcine; Huiles d’agrumes; Flavonoids; CBD à spectre complet; Gélatine; Gingembre; Huile de graines de chanvre; Huile de lavande; Huile de citron; Huile MCT; Mélatonine; Colorants naturels; Arômes naturels; Acides gras oméga 3; Acides gras oméga 6; Pectine; Huile de menthe poivrée; Conservateurs; Édulcorants; Terpènes; Curcuma longa; Vitamine E; Autre
pl: Składniki CBD: Sztuczne barwniki; Sztuczne aromaty; CBD o szerokim spektrum; Izolat CBD; Kapsaicyna; Olejki cytrusowe; Flawonoidy; CBD o pełnym spektrum; Żelatyna; Imbir; Olej z nasion konopi; Olejek lawendowy; Olejek cytrynowy; Olejek MCT; Melatonina; Naturalne barwniki; Naturalne aromaty; Kwasy tłuszczowe omega-3; Kwasy tłuszczowe omega-6; Pektyna; Olejek z mięty pieprzowej; Konserwanty; Słodziki; Terpeny; Kurkuma; Witamina E; Inne
hr-HR: Sastojci s CBD-om: Umjetna bojila; Umjetni okusi; CBD širokog spektra; CBD izolat; Kapsaicin; Citrusna ulja; Flavonoidi; CBD punog spektra; Želatina; Đumbir; Ulje sjemenki konoplje; Ulje lavande; Ulje limuna; MCT ulje; Melatonin; Prirodna bojila; Prirodni okusi; Omega-3 masne kiseline; Omega-6 masne kiseline; Pektin; Ulje paprene metvice; Konzervansi; Zaslađivači; Terpeni; Kurkuma; Vitamin E; Ostalo
pt-PT: Ingredientes CBD: Corantes artificiais; Aromatizantes artificiais; CBD de largo espetro; Isolado de CBD; Capsaicina; Óleos cítricos; Flavonóides; CBD de espetro total; Gelatina; Gengibre; Óleo de grainha de uva; Óleo de lavanda; Óleo de limão; Óleo MCT; Melatonina; Corantes naturais; Aromatizantes naturais; Ácidos gordos ómega 3; Ácidos gordos ómega 6; Pectina; Óleo de menta; Conservantes; Adoçantes; Terpenos; Açafrão-da-Índia; Vitamina E; Outro
tr: CBD içerikleri: Yapay renklendiriciler; Yapay tatlandırıcılar; Geniş spektrumlu CBD; CBD izolatı; kapsaisin; Narenciye yağları; Flavonoidler; Tam spektrum CBD; Jelatin; Zencefil; Kenevir tohumu yağı; Lavanta yağı; Limon yağı; MCT yağı; Melatonin; Doğal renklendiriciler; Doğal tatlandırıcılar; Omega-3 yağ asitleri; Omega-6 yağ asitleri; Pektin; Nane yağı; Koruyucular; Tatlandırıcılar; Terpenler; Zerdeçal; E vitamini; Diğer
pt-BR: Ingredientes com CBD: Corantes artificiais; Aromas artificiais; CBD de espectro amplo; CBD isolado; Capsaicina; Óleos cítricos; Flavonoides; CBD de espectro completo; Gelatina; Gengibre; Óleo de sementes de cânhamo; Óleo de lavanda; Óleo de limão; Óleo MCT; Melatonina; Corantes naturais; Aromas naturais; Ácidos graxos Ômega-3; Ácidos graxos Ômega-6; Pectina; Óleo de hortelã; Conservantes; Adoçantes; Terpenos; Cúrcuma; Vitamina E; Outro
nl: Ingrediënten CBD: Kunstmatige kleurstoffen; Kunstmatige smaakstoffen; Breed-spectrum CBD; CBD-isolaat; Capsaicin; Citrus oliën; Flavonoïden; Volledig spectrum CBD; Gelatine; Gember; Hennepzaad olie; Lavendelolie; Citroen olie; MCT-olie; Melatonine; Natuurlijke kleurstoffen; Natuurlijke smaakstoffen; Omega-3 vetzuren; Omega-6 vetzuren; Pectine; Pepermuntolie; Conserveringsmiddelen; Zoetstoffen; Terpenen; Kurkuma; Vitamine E; Andere
es: Ingredientes de CBD: Colorantes artificiales; Saborizantes artificiales; CBD de amplio espectro; Aislado de CBD; Capsaicina; Aceites cítricos; Flavonoides; CBD de espectro completo; Gelatina; Jengibre; Aceite de semilla de cáñamo; Aceite de lavanda; Aceite de limón; Aceite MCT; Melatonina; Colorantes naturales; Saborizantes naturales; Ácidos grasos omega 3; Ácidos grasos omega 6; Pectina; Aceite de menta piperita; Conservantes; Edulcorantes; Terpenos; Cúrcuma; Vitamina E; Otros